tex/context/patterns/lang-is.pat
[aeligature][eth]4ug
4[aeligature]f
[aeligature]f1a
[aeligature]4fi
[aeligature]f3ust
[aeligature]g5ist
[aeligature]1i
[aeligature]j3
[aeligature]j4al
[aeligature]jark4
[aeligature]k1a
[aeligature]k1li
[aeligature]k3u
[aeligature]2l
[aeligature]l3an
[aeligature]l3e
[aeligature]l3us
[aeligature]m3a
[aeligature]m4al
[aeligature]4mundu
[aeligature]nak4
[aeligature]n4k
[aeligature]r1a
[aeligature]r3e
[aeligature]rg[odiaeresis]ng5
[aeligature]rif4
[aeligature]r3ist
[aeligature]ri3sv
[aeligature]r3l
[aeligature]r4n
[aeligature]r2s
[aeligature]r5un
[aeligature]r1us
[aeligature]5r[uacute]
[aeligature]s4is
[aeligature]t5ise
[aeligature]tl5i
[aeligature]5u
[aeligature]va5g
[aeligature]5val
[aeligature]v3ar
[aeligature]v4ara
[aeligature]3ve
[aeligature]v3in
[odiaeresis][eth]2
[odiaeresis][eth]l3
[odiaeresis][eth]m5
[odiaeresis][eth]3un
[odiaeresis][eth]v5an
[odiaeresis][eth]v3ar
[odiaeresis]1fa
[odiaeresis]fl3[oacute]
[odiaeresis]fn5
[odiaeresis]fr3u
[odiaeresis]f3u
[odiaeresis]4g
[odiaeresis]g3gj
[odiaeresis]ggv3
[odiaeresis]g1re
[odiaeresis]g2us
[odiaeresis]k5e
[odiaeresis]k5r[aacute]
[odiaeresis]k3st
[odiaeresis]k3ul
[odiaeresis]kv3a
[odiaeresis]4l
[odiaeresis]l1f4
[odiaeresis]lk2
[odiaeresis]lu5mi
[odiaeresis]l5un
[odiaeresis]l2v
[odiaeresis]lv5an
[odiaeresis]m4b
[odiaeresis]m3u
[odiaeresis]nd4l
[odiaeresis]ng5sv
[odiaeresis]ng4us
[odiaeresis]ng4v
[odiaeresis]ngv3a
[odiaeresis]nk3
[odiaeresis]nn4l
[odiaeresis]n3ug
[odiaeresis]n5un
[odiaeresis]r1e
[odiaeresis]r4ge
[odiaeresis]r4lan
[odiaeresis]rm5un
[odiaeresis]r3[oacute]
[odiaeresis]r3ug
[odiaeresis]r1un
[odiaeresis]r3und
[odiaeresis]rus4
[odiaeresis]r2v
4[odiaeresis]rva
[odiaeresis]rv5al
[odiaeresis]rv5an
[odiaeresis]rv5ar
[odiaeresis]rv4i
[odiaeresis]r1y
[odiaeresis]r5[aeligature]
[odiaeresis]4s
[odiaeresis]sk3ul
[odiaeresis]s3u
[odiaeresis]t4s
[odiaeresis]3tug
[odiaeresis]t2v
[odiaeresis]tv3a
[odiaeresis]5u
}

% end pattern data
